Oklahoma, session 2026, SB330.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4024 of Title 2, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. For the purposes of this section:
1. “Authority” means the Oklahoma State University Veterinary
Medicine Authority;
2. “Management plan” means a document developed by the Oklahoma
State University Veterinary Medicine Authority based on the findings
of the study pursuant to this section that outlines the recommended
actions for the conservation and management of elk populations in
this state; and

3. “Study zone” means the Special Northwest Zone that
encompasses all private lands in Woodward, Dewey, and Ellis
counties, and a portion of Roger Mills County north of State
Highways 33 and 47 to the north county line and west to the state
border and east to the county line.
B. No later than November 1, 2026, the Oklahoma State
University Veterinary Medicine Authority in cooperation with the
Oklahoma State University College of Veterinary Medicine shall
establish a plan and outline for a comprehensive study of the elk
populations within the Special Northwest Zone. This study shall
assess current population levels, trends, and habitat usage, and
develop science-based management recommendations aimed at ensuring
the long-term sustainability of elk populations and the health of
the ecosystem. The study shall include, but not be limited to, the
following program characteristics:
1. The current elk population size, distribution, and density
within the study zone;
2. The health and genetic diversity of the elk population,
including disease monitoring and signs of inbreeding, or other
health concerns; and
3. The effectiveness and impact of current elk population
management strategies, including hunting, predation control, and
habitat management.
Recommendations from the study shall be assessed and compiled in
a management plan for the conservation and management of elk
populations within the study zone and shall be made available on the
Authority’s website.
C. The Authority may coordinate with other relevant state and
federal agencies to effectuate the provisions of this section. Such
coordination may include requests for temporary suspension and
restrictions on elk hunting and harvesting while the study is being
conducted.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
ENR. S. B. NO. 330 Page 2

SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 330 Page 3

Passed the Senate the 26th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 29th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 330 Page 4